Massachusetts, session 194th, S57.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 2 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 64 the
following section:-
Section 65. The Atlantic Horseshoe Crab (Limulus polyphemus) shall be the official
marine invertebrate of the Commonwealth.
of 1